Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Public School Facilities in General.

Sec. 14.11.005.
School construction grant fund.

There is created a school construction grant fund as an account in the general fund.
The fund shall be used to make grants for the costs of school construction.
Legislative appropriations for school construction shall be deposited in the fund, and the proceeds from the sale of general obligation bonds for school construction may be deposited in the fund.

History.

(§ 5 ch 5 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For loss protection, see 4 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 14.11.007.
Major maintenance grant fund.

There is created a major maintenance grant fund as an account in the general fund. The fund shall be used to make grants for the costs of school major maintenance. Legislative appropriations for school major maintenance shall be deposited in the fund.

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1993)

Sec. 14.11.008.
School district participation in grant program.

In order to receive a grant under this chapter or an appropriation under AS

37.05.560

, a district must provide a percentage share of the project cost, as determined under (b) or (c) of this section. Except as provided in (d) or (g) of this section, a district shall provide the required participating share within three years after the date that the appropriation bill funding the grant is passed by the legislature.

The required participating share for a municipal school district is based on the district’s full value per average daily membership (ADM), which is calculated by dividing the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district, calculated as described in AS

14.17.510

, by the district ADM as defined in AS

14.17.990

, for the same fiscal year for which the valuation was made. The municipal district’s full value per ADM determines the district’s required participating share, as follows:

The required participating share for a regional educational attendance area is two percent. The participating share for any district may be satisfied by money from federal, local, or other sources, or with locally contributed labor, material, or equipment.

If a district with full value per ADM of $200,000 or less can demonstrate in writing that it is unable to provide the required participating share or that the participating share required under this section will jeopardize receipt of federal assistance, the commissioner may waive all or a portion of the required participating share.

State funds provided under this chapter may not be a source of the participating share required under (b) or (c) of this section.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 3 SSSLA 2002.]

The commissioner may extend the time allowed for a district to provide the required participating share for an additional period of not more than seven years if the district applies to the commissioner in writing to request an extension and demonstrates good cause for the requested extension. The commissioner may find good cause if

a request for extension identifies a project constraint that requires a reasonable extension of time;

the extension will not jeopardize the successful completion of the project as described in a grant agreement under AS

14.11.017

;

the extension will not result in an increase of state funding of the project cost; and

the district demonstrates a good faith effort to secure funding for its participating share within the time required by (a) of this section and reasonably expects to secure the funding within the additional time requested by the extension.

Full Value Per ADM District Participating Share $1 — $150,000 5 percent 150,001 — 275,000 10 percent 275,001 — 500,000 20 percent 500,001 — 800,000 30 percent over 800,000 35 percent.

Click to view

History.

(§ 4 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 17 ch 83 SLA 1998; am §§ 1 — 3, 11 ch 3 SSSLA 2002; am § 25 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 93 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 78 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendment of subsection (a) and addition of subsection (g), see sec. 3, ch. 78, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 22, 2010, and applicable retroactively to an appropriation made under AS

37.05.560

or a grant approved under AS

14.11.008(a)

on or after April 1, 2008, in the table in (b), in the third line, substituted “275,001 — 500,000” and “20 percent” for “275,001 — 800,000” and “30 percent”, and added the fourth line.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 6, 2018, in (a), added “Except as provided in (d) or (g) of this section, a” at the beginning of the second sentence, and made a related change; added (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 9, ch. 93, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (b) of this section apply “retroactively to an appropriation made under AS

37.05.560

or a grant approved under [(a) of this section] on or after April 1, 2008.”

Sec. 14.11.010.
Recommendations and evaluations of projects. [Repealed, § 15 ch 5 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 14.11.011.
Grant applications.

A municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area may submit a request to the department for a grant under this chapter.

For a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area to be eligible for a grant under this chapter, the district shall submit

a six-year capital improvement plan that includes a description of the district’s fixed asset inventory system and preventive maintenance program no later than September 1 of the fiscal year before the fiscal year for which the request is made; the six-year plan must contain for each proposed project a detailed scope of work, a project budget, and documentation of conditions justifying the project;

evidence that the district has secured and will maintain adequate property loss insurance for the replacement cost of all facilities for which state funds are available under AS

14.11.005

or

14.11.007

or has a program of insurance acceptable to the department;

evidence acceptable to the department that the proposed project should be a capital improvement project and not part of a preventive maintenance program or regular custodial care program; and

evidence acceptable to the department that the district

has a preventive maintenance plan that

includes a computerized maintenance management program, cardex system, or other formal systematic means of tracking the timing and costs associated with planned and completed maintenance activities, including scheduled preventive maintenance;

addresses energy management for buildings owned or operated by the district;

includes a regular custodial care program for buildings owned or operated by the district;

includes preventive maintenance training for facility managers and maintenance employees;

includes renewal and replacement schedules for electrical, mechanical, structural, and other components of facilities owned or operated by the district; and

is adequately adhering to the preventive maintenance plan.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1998; am §§ 4, 5 ch 3 SSSLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

For loss protection, see 4 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 14.11.013.
Department review of grant applications.

With regard to projects for which grants are requested under AS

14.11.011

, the department shall

annually review the six-year plans submitted by each district under AS

14.11.011

(b) and recommend to the board a revised and updated six-year capital improvement project grant schedule that serves the best interests of the state and each district; in recommending projects for this schedule, the department shall verify that each proposed project meets the criteria established under AS

14.11.014(b)

and qualifies as a project required to

avert imminent danger or correct life-threatening situations;

house students who would otherwise be unhoused; for purposes of this subparagraph, students are considered unhoused if the students attend school in temporary facilities;

protect the structure of existing school facilities;

correct building code deficiencies that require major repair or rehabilitation in order for the facility to continue to be used for the educational program;

achieve an operating cost savings;

modify or rehabilitate facilities for the purpose of improving the instructional program;

meet an educational need not specified in (A) — (F) of this paragraph, identified by the department;

prepare an estimate of the amount of money needed to finance each project;

provide to the governor, by November 1, and to the legislature within the first 10 days of each regular legislative session, a revised and updated six-year capital improvement project grant schedule, together with a proposed schedule of appropriations;

encourage each school district to use previously approved school construction design plans and building systems if the use will result in cost savings for the project;

consider the regionally based model school construction standards developed under AS

14.11.017(d)

.

In preparing the construction grant schedule, the department shall establish priorities among projects for which grants are requested and shall award school construction grants in the order of priority established. In establishing priorities, the department shall evaluate at least the following factors, without establishing an absolute priority for any one factor:

emergency requirements;

priorities assigned by the district to the projects requested;

new local elementary and secondary programs;

existing regional, community, and school facilities, and their condition; this paragraph does not include administrative facilities;

the amount of district operating funds expended for maintenance;

other options that would reduce or eliminate the need for the request;

the district’s use of previously approved school construction design plans and building systems if the use will result in cost savings for the project; and

consideration of regionally based model school construction standards under AS

14.11.017(d)

.

The department may

modify a project request when necessary to achieve cost-effective school construction;

require that a school construction project be phased for purposes of planning, design, and construction;

reject project requests and omit them from the six-year schedule due to

incomplete information or documentation provided by the district;

a determination by the department that existing facilities can adequately serve the program requirements, or that alternative projects are in the best interests of the state;

a determination that the project is not in the best interest of the state; and

require that a school construction project include all or part of the regionally based model school construction standards developed under AS

14.11.017(d)

or use previously approved design plans and building systems that would result in capital or operating cost savings for the project.

The department shall reduce a project budget by the cost of those portions of a project design that the department determines (1) are for construction of student residential space, planetariums, hockey rinks, saunas, and other facilities for single purpose sporting or recreational uses that are not suitable for other activities; or (2) do not meet the criteria developed under AS

14.11.014(b)

that are applicable to the project. This subsection does not apply to funding for swimming pools that meet criteria established by the department.

By November 5, the department shall provide public notice of the grant applications submitted under (a) of this section and the priorities established under (b) of this section. After public notice has been given, the department shall, not later than December 1, hold a public hearing on the priorities established under (b) of this section. In this subsection, “public notice” means notice published in a newspaper of general circulation and notice to every person who has requested notice about the grant application program from the department.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 2 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 79 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, added (a)(3) and (4); added (b)(7) and (8); added (c)(4), and made related changes.

Sec. 14.11.014.
Bond reimbursement and grant review committee.

The commissioner shall establish a bond reimbursement and grant review committee for the purpose described in (b) of this section. In making selections to the committee, the commissioner shall seek to maintain a regional statewide balance on the committee. The committee shall consist of the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee, two members of the legislature selected by the presiding officers of the house and senate, and six other people selected by the commissioner as follows:

two persons shall have professional degrees and experience in school construction;

two persons shall have experience in urban or rural school facilities management;

two persons shall represent the public.

The committee shall

review the department’s priorities among projects for which school construction grants are requested;

make recommendations to the board concerning school construction grants and make recommendations to the commissioner concerning projects for which bond reimbursement is requested;

develop criteria for construction of schools in the state; criteria developed under this paragraph must include requirements intended to achieve cost-effective school construction;

analyze existing prototypical designs for school construction projects;

establish a form for grant applications;

establish a method of ranking grant projects;

recommend to the board necessary changes to the approval process for school construction grants and for projects for which bond reimbursement is requested;

set standards for energy efficiency for school construction and major maintenance to provide energy efficiency benefits for all school locations in the state and that address energy efficiency in design and energy systems that minimize long-term energy and operating costs.

Members of the committee serve without compensation, but members who are not representing the department are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the committee may not recommend for approval an application for bond debt reimbursement made by a municipality for school construction or major maintenance for indebtedness authorized by the qualified voters of the municipality on or after January 1, 2015, but before July 1, 2025.

History.

(§ 9 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 2020)

Delayed repeal. —

Under sec. 6,
ch. 3, SLA 2015, as amended by sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2020, subsection (d) of this section is repealed July 1, 2025.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (d).

The 2020 amendment, effective June 30, 2020, substituted “before July 1, 2025” for “before July 1, 2020” at the end of (d).

Sec. 14.11.015.
Approval of grant applications.

The board shall review grant applications that have been recommended by the department under AS

14.11.013

, and may approve a grant application if the board determines that the project meets the criteria specified in AS

14.11.013(a)(1)

and

14.11.014

. The department may not award a grant unless the grant application is approved by the board.

To the extent that money is available in the appropriate fund, the department shall award grants approved under (a) of this section in the order of the projects’ priority on the date the appropriation bill funding the appropriate grant fund is passed by the legislature, regardless of any appeal pending under AS

14.11.016

. Appeals pending under AS

14.11.016

at the time that grants are awarded may not delay the funding of grants awarded under this section.

If a project is assigned a new priority ranking under AS

14.11.016

after the date of passage by the legislature of the appropriation bill for the appropriate grant fund, the project must be funded from the appropriate fund in accordance with the new priority ranking at the next time that grants are awarded.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 78 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Sec. 14.11.016.
Administrative and judicial review.

A district may request reconsideration of a decision of the department assigning a priority to the district’s project, establishing the scope of the project, or establishing the budget for the project. The request must be in writing and must include a statement of the specific changes desired, and a summary of the evidence supporting the district’s claim that the department has erred in its review of the district’s grant application. A request for reconsideration must be received by the department by the day of the public hearing held under AS

14.11.013(e)

. The department shall review its decision on the basis of the request by the district and determine whether its decision should be changed. The department shall issue its determination in writing within 15 days after the last day of the public hearing held under AS

14.11.013(e)

.

A district may appeal an adverse decision of the department under (a) of this section by filing a written notice of appeal with the commissioner within 15 days after the date of the department’s decision. The notice of appeal must state the legal and factual basis for the appeal and the precise relief sought. The failure of the district to include an issue in a notice of appeal constitutes a waiver of the right to have the issue considered. Not later than 10 days after receipt by the commissioner of a notice of appeal, the chief administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings ( AS

44.64.010

) shall appoint an administrative law judge who is qualified under AS

44.62.350(c)

to serve as hearing officer and consider the appeal. If the hearing officer finds that the notice of appeal does not raise a reasonable issue of fact or law, the hearing officer shall issue a written decision denying the appeal. Denial of an appeal by hearing officer is a final decision that may be appealed under (d) of this section. If the hearing officer finds that the notice of appeal raises a reasonable issue of fact or law, the hearing officer shall conduct a hearing on those issues and recommend a decision to the board. The hearing officer shall issue a decision on the appeal not later than 60 days after being appointed. The board shall consider the recommended decision of the hearing officer at its next regularly scheduled meeting and may adopt all, part, or none of the recommended decision or may remand the issue to the hearing officer for further hearings. The board shall issue its decision in writing within 10 days after consideration of the hearing officer’s decision.

The hearing officer may consolidate appeals under (b) of this section, if the notices of appeal raise related issues of fact or law.

A district may appeal an adverse decision of a hearing officer or the board under (b) of this section to the superior court in the manner provided by AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

The board shall adopt regulations governing procedures for the reconsideration and appeal of decisions under this section. The regulations adopted under this subsection are not required to conform to AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

, but shall be consistent with minimum standards of due process.

A district may not request reconsideration of or appeal a priority determination on the grounds that a revised priority assigned to another project, due to a reconsideration or appeal under this section, has resulted in a lower priority being accorded to the district’s project.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.11.017.
Grant conditions.

The department shall require in the grant agreement that a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area

agree to construction of a facility of appropriate size and use that meets criteria adopted by the department if the grant is for school construction;

provide reasonable assurance by a means acceptable to the department, that the cost of the project will be uniform with the costs of the most current construction or major maintenance projects, as appropriate, in the area;

agree to limit equipment purchases to that required for the approved project plan submitted under (5) of this subsection and account for all equipment purchased for the project under a fixed asset inventory system approved by the department;

submit project budgets for department approval and agree that the grant amount may, at the discretion of the department, be reduced or increased by amounts equal to the amounts by which contracts vary from the budget amounts approved by the department; and

submit to the department for approval, before award of the contract, a plan for the project that includes educational specifications, final drawings, and contract documents.

The cost of any school construction or major maintenance activity encompassed by the definition of “costs of school construction” under AS

14.11.135

is payable under a grant awarded from the appropriate fund under AS

14.11.015

without regard to whether the costs were incurred before the

award of the grant;

approval of the grant application by the board; or

effective date of an appropriation to the appropriate grant fund for the year in which the grant is funded.

The department, by regulation, may establish the time period in which activities described in (b) of this section must have occurred in order to be paid under a grant.

The department shall develop and periodically update regionally based model school construction standards that describe acceptable building systems and anticipated costs and establish school design ratios to achieve efficient and cost-effective school construction. In developing the standards, the department shall consider the standards and criteria developed under AS

14.11.014(b)

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am §§ 11, 12 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 4 ch 79 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 14.11.019.
Grant appropriations.

Within the appropriation bill authorizing capital expenditures submitted to the legislature under AS 37.07.020(a)(3), the governor shall include an appropriation for grants in the succeeding fiscal year as determined by the six-year capital improvement project grant schedule prepared under AS

14.11.013

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 5 SLA 1990; am § 13 ch 78 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1997)

Sec. 14.11.020.
Assumption of responsibilities.

The assembly or council of a municipality that is a school district or a regional school board may, by resolution or majority vote of the body, assume the responsibilities relating to the planning, design, and construction of a school or an education-related facility located within the boundaries or operating area of the municipality or regional educational attendance area. After receipt of a request by an assembly or council under this subsection, the department shall provide for the assumption of the responsibilities requested. After receipt of a request by a regional school board under this subsection, the department may provide for the assumption of the responsibilities requested.

If a municipality that is a school district or a regional educational attendance area assumes the responsibilities under this section, the department shall grant to the municipality or regional educational attendance area money appropriated for the school or education-related facility. The department may transfer the appropriations to a special construction account in the state treasury. Under the fiscal control of the department, a municipality or regional educational attendance area that assumes responsibilities for the project as provided in this section may draw on the account for costs of the project.

The construction management costs of a project assumed under this section may not exceed four percent of the amount of appropriations for the facility if the amount of appropriations is $500,000 or less. The construction management costs of a project assumed under this section may not exceed three percent of the amount of appropriations for the facility if the amount of appropriations is over $500,000 but less than $5,000,000. The construction management costs of a project assumed under this section may not exceed two percent of the amount of appropriations for the facility if the amount of appropriations is $5,000,000 or more. For purposes of this subsection “construction management” means management of the project’s schedule, quality, and budget during any phase of the planning, design, and construction of the facility by a private contractor engaged by the municipality or regional educational attendance area.

The commissioner shall adopt necessary regulations implementing this section, and setting out the requirements for agreements between the department and a municipality or regional educational attendance area relating to the assumption by the municipality or regional educational attendance area of responsibilities for the planning, design, and construction of a project.

History.

(§ 3 ch 92 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 14.07.190. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For planning and construction, see 4 AAC 31, art. 1.

Sec. 14.11.025.
State aid for school construction in regional educational attendance areas and small municipal school districts.

In addition to other appropriations and funding sources, the department may provide grant funding from the fund established under AS

14.11.030

to a school district that is a regional educational attendance area or a small municipal school district.

The amount of money available each fiscal year for expenditure under (a) of this section shall be the annual debt service on debt incurred under AS

14.11.100(a)

divided by the percentage of all schools that are located in a city or borough school district that is not a small municipal school district, the quotient of which is to be multiplied by .244.

In this section, “small municipal school district” means a city or borough school district in the state that has an ADM of not more than 300 and in which the district’s full value per ADM is not more than $500,000. In this subsection, the district’s full value per ADM is determined by dividing the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in the district, calculated as described in AS

14.17.510

, by the district ADM, as defined in AS

14.17.990

, for the same fiscal year for which the valuation was made.

History.

(§ 5 ch 93 SLA 2010; am §§ 1, 2 ch 49 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 16, 2013, in (a), added “or a small municipal school district” at the end; in (b), inserted “that is not a small municipal school district” following “borough school district”; added (c).

Sec. 14.11.030.
Regional educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund.

The regional educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund is created as an account in the general fund to be used, in addition to other funding sources, to fund projects approved under AS

14.11.025

for the costs of school construction and major maintenance in regional educational attendance areas and small municipal school districts. The primary function of the fund is to fund school construction projects.

Legislative appropriations, including appropriations of interest earned on the fund, shall be deposited in the fund established under this section. The unobligated and unexpended cash balance of the fund may not exceed $70,000,000.

Money appropriated to the fund does not lapse except to the extent money in the fund exceeds the maximum fund balance specified in (b) of this section.

In this section, “small municipal school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.11.025

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 93 SLA 2010; am §§ 3, 4 ch 49 SLA 2013; am §§ 5, 6 ch 79 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 16, 2013, in (a), twice inserted “and small municipal school district” or similar, following “attendance area” or similar; added (d).

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, in (a), inserted “and major maintenance” following “school construction” near the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence; in (b), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The fund balance may not exceed $70,000,000.”

Sec. 14.11.035.
Report on school construction and major maintenance funding.

Every February, the department shall provide to the governor and the legislature an annual report on the effectiveness of the school construction and major maintenance grants, state aid for school construction and major maintenance in regional educational attendance areas, and state aid for costs of school construction debt under this chapter. The report must include an analysis of funding sources and the short-term and long-term fiscal effects of the funding on the state. Copies of the report shall be made available to the public and to the legislature.

History.

(§ 5 ch 93 SLA 2010; am § 7 ch 79 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, substituted “Every February” for “Beginning in February, 2013” at the beginning of the first sentence, inserted “and major maintenance” following “state aid for school construction”.